SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0500 Y 28
SFX 0500 ć tli .
SFX 0500 ć tu .
SFX 0500 ć tł .
SFX 0500 ć tła .
SFX 0500 ć tłe .
SFX 0500 ć tło .
SFX 0500 ć tłoj .
SFX 0500 ć ćacy .
SFX 0500 ć će .
SFX 0500 ć ćech .
SFX 0500 ć ćechmoj .
SFX 0500 ć ćechmy .
SFX 0500 ć ćechu .
SFX 0500 ć ćemoj .
SFX 0500 ć ćemy .
SFX 0500 ć ćenje .
SFX 0500 ć ćeny .
SFX 0500 ć ćetaj .
SFX 0500 ć ćetej .
SFX 0500 ć ćeće .
SFX 0500 ć ćeš .
SFX 0500 ć ćeše .
SFX 0500 ć ćeštaj .
SFX 0500 ć ćeštej .
SFX 0500 ć ćešće .
SFX 0500 ć ćtaj .
SFX 0500 ć ćtej .
SFX 0500 ć ćće .

SFX 0501 Y 13
SFX 0501 a ach .
SFX 0501 a aj .
SFX 0501 a am .
SFX 0501 a ami .
SFX 0501 a ej .
SFX 0501 a o .
SFX 0501 a om .
SFX 0501 a omaj .
SFX 0501 a ow .
SFX 0501 a u .
SFX 0501 a y .
SFX 0501 a yja .
SFX 0501 a źe .

SFX 0502 Y 28
SFX 0502 0 ch .
SFX 0502 0 chmoj .
SFX 0502 0 chmy .
SFX 0502 0 chu .
SFX 0502 0 cy .
SFX 0502 0 j .
SFX 0502 0 ja .
SFX 0502 0 ješ .
SFX 0502 0 jtaj .
SFX 0502 0 jtej .
SFX 0502 0 ju .
SFX 0502 0 jće .
SFX 0502 0 li .
SFX 0502 0 moj .
SFX 0502 0 my .
SFX 0502 0 nje .
SFX 0502 0 taj .
SFX 0502 0 tej .
SFX 0502 0 ty .
SFX 0502 0 ć .
SFX 0502 0 će .
SFX 0502 0 ł .
SFX 0502 0 ła .
SFX 0502 0 ło .
SFX 0502 0 łoj .
SFX 0502 0 štaj .
SFX 0502 0 štej .
SFX 0502 0 šće .

SFX 0503 Y 31
SFX 0503 ć owach .
SFX 0503 ć owachmoj .
SFX 0503 ć owachmy .
SFX 0503 ć owachu .
SFX 0503 ć owacy .
SFX 0503 ć owali .
SFX 0503 ć owanje .
SFX 0503 ć owany .
SFX 0503 ć ować .
SFX 0503 ć ował .
SFX 0503 ć owała .
SFX 0503 ć owało .
SFX 0503 ć owałoj .
SFX 0503 ć owaše .
SFX 0503 ć owaštaj .
SFX 0503 ć owaštej .
SFX 0503 ć owašće .
SFX 0503 ć uj .
SFX 0503 ć uja .
SFX 0503 ć uje .
SFX 0503 ć ujemoj .
SFX 0503 ć ujemy .
SFX 0503 ć ujetaj .
SFX 0503 ć ujetej .
SFX 0503 ć ujeće .
SFX 0503 ć uješ .
SFX 0503 ć ujtaj .
SFX 0503 ć ujtej .
SFX 0503 ć uju .
SFX 0503 ć ujće .
SFX 0503 ć yć .

SFX 0504 Y 29
SFX 0504 du dli ..
SFX 0504 du dł ..
SFX 0504 du dła ..
SFX 0504 du dłe ..
SFX 0504 du dło ..
SFX 0504 du dłoj ..
SFX 0504 du dź ..
SFX 0504 du dźacy ..
SFX 0504 du dźe ..
SFX 0504 du dźech ..
SFX 0504 du dźechmoj ..
SFX 0504 du dźechmy ..
SFX 0504 du dźechu ..
SFX 0504 du dźemoj ..
SFX 0504 du dźemy ..
SFX 0504 du dźenje ..
SFX 0504 du dźeny ..
SFX 0504 du dźetaj ..
SFX 0504 du dźetej ..
SFX 0504 du dźeće ..
SFX 0504 du dźeš ..
SFX 0504 du dźeštaj ..
SFX 0504 du dźeštej ..
SFX 0504 du dźešće ..
SFX 0504 du dźtaj ..
SFX 0504 du dźtej ..
SFX 0504 du dźće ..
SFX 0504 du ować ..
SFX 0504 du sć ..

SFX 0505 Y 28
SFX 0505 eć asć ..
SFX 0505 eć atli ..
SFX 0505 eć atu ..
SFX 0505 eć atł ..
SFX 0505 eć atła ..
SFX 0505 eć atłe ..
SFX 0505 eć atło ..
SFX 0505 eć atłoj ..
SFX 0505 eć ećacy ..
SFX 0505 eć eće ..
SFX 0505 eć ećech ..
SFX 0505 eć ećechmoj ..
SFX 0505 eć ećechmy ..
SFX 0505 eć ećechu ..
SFX 0505 eć ećemoj ..
SFX 0505 eć ećemy ..
SFX 0505 eć ećenje ..
SFX 0505 eć ećeny ..
SFX 0505 eć ećetaj ..
SFX 0505 eć ećetej ..
SFX 0505 eć ećeće ..
SFX 0505 eć ećeš ..
SFX 0505 eć ećeštaj ..
SFX 0505 eć ećeštej ..
SFX 0505 eć ećešće ..
SFX 0505 eć ećtaj ..
SFX 0505 eć ećtej ..
SFX 0505 eć ećće ..

SFX 0506 Y 8
SFX 0506 a ach .
SFX 0506 a am .
SFX 0506 a ami .
SFX 0506 a eje .
SFX 0506 a je .
SFX 0506 a omaj .
SFX 0506 a ow .
SFX 0506 a u .

SFX 0507 Y 29
SFX 0507 0 ch .
SFX 0507 0 chmoj .
SFX 0507 0 chmy .
SFX 0507 0 chu .
SFX 0507 0 j .
SFX 0507 0 ja .
SFX 0507 0 jacy .
SFX 0507 0 je .
SFX 0507 0 jemoj .
SFX 0507 0 jemy .
SFX 0507 0 jetaj .
SFX 0507 0 jetej .
SFX 0507 0 jeće .
SFX 0507 0 jtaj .
SFX 0507 0 jtej .
SFX 0507 0 jće .
SFX 0507 0 li .
SFX 0507 0 ty .
SFX 0507 0 ć .
SFX 0507 0 će .
SFX 0507 0 ł .
SFX 0507 0 ła .
SFX 0507 0 łe .
SFX 0507 0 ło .
SFX 0507 0 łoj .
SFX 0507 0 š .
SFX 0507 0 štaj .
SFX 0507 0 štej .
SFX 0507 0 šće .

SFX 0508 Y 30
SFX 0508 ń njacy .
SFX 0508 ń nje .
SFX 0508 ń njemoj .
SFX 0508 ń njemy .
SFX 0508 ń njenje .
SFX 0508 ń njeny .
SFX 0508 ń njetaj .
SFX 0508 ń njetej .
SFX 0508 ń njeće .
SFX 0508 ń nješ .
SFX 0508 ń nować .
SFX 0508 ń nu .
SFX 0508 ń ny .
SFX 0508 ń nych .
SFX 0508 ń nychmoj .
SFX 0508 ń nychmy .
SFX 0508 ń nychu .
SFX 0508 ń nyli .
SFX 0508 ń nyć .
SFX 0508 ń nył .
SFX 0508 ń nyła .
SFX 0508 ń nyło .
SFX 0508 ń nyłoj .
SFX 0508 ń nyštaj .
SFX 0508 ń nyštej .
SFX 0508 ń nyšće .
SFX 0508 ń nć .
SFX 0508 ń ńtaj .
SFX 0508 ń ńtej .
SFX 0508 ń ńće .

SFX 0509 Y 31
SFX 0509 0 a .
SFX 0509 0 ach .
SFX 0509 0 achmoj .
SFX 0509 0 achmy .
SFX 0509 0 achu .
SFX 0509 0 acy .
SFX 0509 0 any .
SFX 0509 0 ał .
SFX 0509 0 ała .
SFX 0509 0 ało .
SFX 0509 0 ałoj .
SFX 0509 0 eli .
SFX 0509 0 enje .
SFX 0509 0 eć .
SFX 0509 0 eštaj .
SFX 0509 0 eštej .
SFX 0509 0 ešće .
SFX 0509 0 i .
SFX 0509 0 imoj .
SFX 0509 0 imy .
SFX 0509 0 itaj .
SFX 0509 0 itej .
SFX 0509 0 iće .
SFX 0509 0 iš .
SFX 0509 0 moj .
SFX 0509 0 my .
SFX 0509 0 so .
SFX 0509 0 taj .
SFX 0509 0 tej .
SFX 0509 0 u .
SFX 0509 0 će .

SFX 0510 Y 11
SFX 0510 t ta .
SFX 0510 t tach .
SFX 0510 t taj .
SFX 0510 t tam .
SFX 0510 t tami .
SFX 0510 t tej .
SFX 0510 t to .
SFX 0510 t tom .
SFX 0510 t tomaj .
SFX 0510 t tow .
SFX 0510 t ty .

SFX 0511 Y 14
SFX 0511 a ach .
SFX 0511 a aj .
SFX 0511 a am .
SFX 0511 a ami .
SFX 0511 a ej .
SFX 0511 a i .
SFX 0511 a ija .
SFX 0511 a o .
SFX 0511 a om .
SFX 0511 a omaj .
SFX 0511 a ow .
SFX 0511 a u .
SFX 0511 a y .
SFX 0511 a źe .

SFX 0512 Y 3
SFX 0512 0 a .
SFX 0512 0 e .
SFX 0512 0 oho .

SFX 0513 Y 9
SFX 0513 ha hach ..
SFX 0513 ha ham ..
SFX 0513 ha hami ..
SFX 0513 ha heje ..
SFX 0513 ha hi ..
SFX 0513 ha homaj ..
SFX 0513 ha how ..
SFX 0513 ha hu ..
SFX 0513 ha ze ..

SFX 0514 Y 20
SFX 0514 a aj .
SFX 0514 a e .
SFX 0514 a eho .
SFX 0514 a ej .
SFX 0514 a eje .
SFX 0514 a eju .
SFX 0514 a emu .
SFX 0514 a i .
SFX 0514 a iši .
SFX 0514 a išo .
SFX 0514 a je .
SFX 0514 a oh .
SFX 0514 a oho .
SFX 0514 a om .
SFX 0514 a u .
SFX 0514 a y .
SFX 0514 a ych .
SFX 0514 a ym .
SFX 0514 a ymaj .
SFX 0514 a ymi .

SFX 0515 Y 13
SFX 0515 ta tach ..
SFX 0515 ta taj ..
SFX 0515 ta tam ..
SFX 0515 ta tami ..
SFX 0515 ta te ..
SFX 0515 ta tej ..
SFX 0515 ta to ..
SFX 0515 ta tojo ..
SFX 0515 ta tom ..
SFX 0515 ta tomaj ..
SFX 0515 ta tow ..
SFX 0515 ta tu ..
SFX 0515 ta će ..

SFX 0516 Y 14
SFX 0516 ta tach ..
SFX 0516 ta taj ..
SFX 0516 ta tam ..
SFX 0516 ta tami ..
SFX 0516 ta te ..
SFX 0516 ta tea ..
SFX 0516 ta tej ..
SFX 0516 ta to ..
SFX 0516 ta tojo ..
SFX 0516 ta tom ..
SFX 0516 ta tomaj ..
SFX 0516 ta tow ..
SFX 0516 ta tu ..
SFX 0516 ta će ..

SFX 0517 Y 31
SFX 0517 0 a .
SFX 0517 0 acy .
SFX 0517 0 ałoj .
SFX 0517 0 e .
SFX 0517 0 ech .
SFX 0517 0 echmoj .
SFX 0517 0 echmy .
SFX 0517 0 echu .
SFX 0517 0 eli .
SFX 0517 0 enje .
SFX 0517 0 eny .
SFX 0517 0 eć .
SFX 0517 0 eł .
SFX 0517 0 eła .
SFX 0517 0 eło .
SFX 0517 0 eštaj .
SFX 0517 0 eštej .
SFX 0517 0 ešće .
SFX 0517 0 i .
SFX 0517 0 imoj .
SFX 0517 0 imy .
SFX 0517 0 itaj .
SFX 0517 0 itej .
SFX 0517 0 iće .
SFX 0517 0 iš .
SFX 0517 0 moj .
SFX 0517 0 my .
SFX 0517 0 taj .
SFX 0517 0 tej .
SFX 0517 0 u .
SFX 0517 0 će .

SFX 0518 Y 29
SFX 0518 0 a .
SFX 0518 0 acy .
SFX 0518 0 ałoj .
SFX 0518 0 e .
SFX 0518 0 ech .
SFX 0518 0 echmoj .
SFX 0518 0 echmy .
SFX 0518 0 echu .
SFX 0518 0 eli .
SFX 0518 0 enje .
SFX 0518 0 eny .
SFX 0518 0 eć .
SFX 0518 0 eł .
SFX 0518 0 eła .
SFX 0518 0 eło .
SFX 0518 0 eštaj .
SFX 0518 0 eštej .
SFX 0518 0 ešće .
SFX 0518 0 i .
SFX 0518 0 imoj .
SFX 0518 0 imy .
SFX 0518 0 itaj .
SFX 0518 0 itej .
SFX 0518 0 iće .
SFX 0518 0 moj .
SFX 0518 0 my .
SFX 0518 0 taj .
SFX 0518 0 tej .
SFX 0518 0 će .

SFX 0519 Y 13
SFX 0519 0 a .
SFX 0519 0 ach .
SFX 0519 0 aj .
SFX 0519 0 am .
SFX 0519 0 ami .
SFX 0519 0 ej .
SFX 0519 0 im .
SFX 0519 0 je .
SFX 0519 0 o .
SFX 0519 0 om .
SFX 0519 0 omaj .
SFX 0519 0 ow .
SFX 0519 0 y .

SFX 0520 Y 12
SFX 0520 0 a .
SFX 0520 0 ach .
SFX 0520 0 aj .
SFX 0520 0 am .
SFX 0520 0 ami .
SFX 0520 0 ej .
SFX 0520 0 ja .
SFX 0520 0 je .
SFX 0520 0 o .
SFX 0520 0 om .
SFX 0520 0 omaj .
SFX 0520 0 ow .
