SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.dic
Ruda/0511
Róžant/0510
Serb/0520
njerosć/0500
njerozmjeć/0505
njesć/0517
njewoboj/0517
njewotmjeć/0505
njewumjeć/0505
njezamjeć/0505
njezmjeć/0505
rosć/0500
rowda/0501
rozka/0502
rozkidć/0503
rozkładu/0504
rozmjeć/0505
rozpołoži/0507
rozpołčna/0506
rozprasń/0508
rozrěč/0509
rozsypć/0503
sam/0512
sama/0514
samodruha/0513
sansculotta/0515
sansculotta/0516
seraf/0519
swakowa/0506
sć/0518
woboj/0517
wotmjeć/0505
wukidć/0503
wumjeć/0505
wusypć/0503
zamjeć/0505
zmjeć/0505
